Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2525YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 335 Section 1. Section 298A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. The moneys in the student activity fund 3 shall not revert to the general fund of the school corporation 4 until the end of the fiscal year in which the moneys were 5 deposited into the student activity fund. 6